src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V3B
  agabso:agabsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  amaaho:amaah	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  aruurso:aruursa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  awo:aw	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  barko:barka	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  bidceyso:bidceysa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  booqo:booq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  buuxso:buuxsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  caashaqo:caashaq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  cadayo:caday	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  cararso:cararsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  codo:coda	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  daalaco:daalac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  daaqso:daaqsa	V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
  dacayo:dacaya	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  dareenso:dareensa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  dayo:day	V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dayo:day	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dhaafso:dhaafsa	V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
  dhaasho:dhaasha	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  dhaawo:dhaaw	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dhabar-garaaco:dhabar-garaac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dhabbaco:dhabbac	V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dhabbaco:dhabbac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dhaqo:dhaq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  dhayalso:dhayalsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  dhibso:dhibsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  dhogofso:dhogofsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  dibbaaqo:dibbaaq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  didso:didsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  ducuumo:ducuuma	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  ergo:erga	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  fidso:fidsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  fiiqo:fiiq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  foofso:foofsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  fooldhaqo:fooldhaq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  fuuqso:fuuqsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  gabro:gabra	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  garooco:garooc	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  garraarso:garraarsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  gasho:gasha	V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
  gawraco:gawrac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  go'aanso:go'aansa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  gowraco:gowrac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  gudo:gud	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  guurso:guursa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  haldhacso:haldhacsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  heenso:heensa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  horjoogso:horjoogsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  ifso:ifsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  isticmaarso:isticmaarsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  jadeerwaco:jadeerwac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  jeexo:jeex	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  jicsimo:jicsima	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  joolaalo:joolaala	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  juco:juc	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  kalabbaxso:kalabbaxsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  kawaano:kawaana	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  kufso:kufsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  le'o:le'	V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  lunso:lunsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  malooqo:malooq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  maluuqo:maluuq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  maraxso:maraxsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  masaxo:masax	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  mayraxso:mayraxsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  miiqo:miiq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  miishmiisho:miishmiisha	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  miliilico:miliilic	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  mudo:muda	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  nintooxso:nintooxsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  qafilo:qafila	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  qararamso:qararamsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  qaydo:qayda	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  qurdudumso:qurdudumsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  raaco:raac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  raagso:raagsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  riiqo:riiq	V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  riiqo:riiq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  riixo:riix	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  rogobso:rogobsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  ruxo:rux	V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  ruxo:rux	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  saanaho:saanah	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  sahanso:sahansa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  saho:sah	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  saxiixo:saxiix	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  saxo:sax	V3B_IV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  saxo:sax	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  shiilo:shiila	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  sibbaaqo:sibbaaq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  silifso:silifsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  sooco:sooc	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  sunto:sunta	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  surbaco:surbac	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  taxo:tax	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  tiirso:tiirsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  tooxo:toox	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  tuunso:tuunsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  waaciidso:waaciidsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  warso:warsa	V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
  weecso:weecsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  weydaarso:weydaarsa	V3B_DV_VerbMorf ;
  xanso:xansa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  xigso:xigsa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  xoqo:xoq	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
  xusuuso:xusuusa	V3B_TV_VerbMorf ;
  yu'o:yu'	V3B_TV_VerbMorf/ADelPart ;
